Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-1990
Restrictions on dividends.

A title insurer shall only declare or distribute a dividend to shareholders without the prior written approval of the director as would be permitted under section 44-2134 for insurers other than life insurers.

Laws 1997, LB 53, § 13.